dictionaries/oc_FR/oc_FR.dic
abespiar/MTLQNaz
abituar/MTLQNaz
aboiar/MTLQaz
aboriarai/x
aborièri/w
abreçarai/x
abrecèri/w
abroar/MTLQNza
abrocarai/MTLQNx
abroguèri/w
absolguèri/MTLQNw
absolgut/y
absolverai/MTLQNx
abstraguèri/MTLQNw
abstrarai/MTLQNx
abstrasiái/MTLQNv
accentuar/MTLQNaz
aconsegrai/x
aconseguiái/w
acorriái/v
acreguèri/w
acreirai/x
acresiái/v
acrocarai/MTLQNx
acroquèri/MTLQNw
adraiar/MTLQNaz
aduguèri/w
aduirai/x
adusiái/v
afoguèri/w
agregarai/x
agroar/MTLQNaz
aiganeguèri/w
ajarai/MTLQNx
ajonguèri/MTLQNw
ajonhiái/MTLQNv
alaiar/MTLQNaz
albergarai/x
aleugèri/w
aliar/MTLQNaz
allegarai/x
aloguèri/w
alonharai/MTLQNx
alotgèri/MTLQNw
anoar/MTLQNaz
anocharai/MTLQNx
anochèri/MTLQNw
apareguèri/MTLQNw
apareisserai/MTLQNx
apareissiái/MTLQNv
apartendrai/MTLQNx
aparteniái/MTLQNv
apatoquèri/MTLQNw
apatuar/MTLQNaz
apercebrai/MTLQNx
apertenguèri/MTLQNw
apilocarai/MTLQNx
apogèri/MTLQNw
aprendrai/x
apreniái/v
aprofiar/MTLQNaz
aquereguèri/MTLQNw
arrediái/MTLQNv
arredrai/MTLQNx
arroquèri/MTLQNw
asolharai/MTLQNx
assaupèri/MTLQNw
assegrai/MTLQNx
asseguiái/MTLQNv
assetgèri/MTLQNw
assetjarai/MTLQNx
astrennhiái/MTLQNv
asulharai/MTLQNx
asulhèri/MTLQNw
atenguèri/MTLQNw
atenhiái/MTLQNv
atenuar/MTLQNaz
atocarai/MTLQNx
atraguèri/MTLQNw
atrasiái/MTLQNv
atroçarai/x
atrofiar/MTLQNaz
auciguèri/MTLQNw
avaluar/MTLQNaz
avendrai/MTLQNx
aveniái/MTLQNv
aviar/MTLQNaz
avoar/MTLQNaz
avoguèri/w
badocarai/x
baiar/azh
bajoquèri/w
bambolear/azh
bambonear/azh
becarai/x
benfaguèri/w
benvolrai/x
bequèri/w
bescoguèri/w
bescoirai/x
bescosiái/v
beurai/x
beviái/v
bicoquèri/w
biografiar/azh
boar/azh
boçarai/x
bogiar/azh
bosquèri/w
breçarai/x
briar/az
brolharai/x
brolhèri/w
broquèri/w
bruejarai/x
brunguèri/w
brunhiái/v
caboçarai/x
calomniar/azh
capescodèri/w
capescodiái/v
captendrai/x
carrocèri/w
cauprai/x
cenguèri/w
cenhiái/v
cernerai/x
circonciguèri/w
circonsisiái/v
clauguèri/w
claurai/x
clausiái/v
clojarai/x
cloquèri/w
coar/za
cocarai/x
coguèri/w
collocarai/x
colloquèri/w
coltocerai/x
coltorciái/v
comercèri/w
compareisserai/x
compariái/v
complaguèri/w
complairai/x
complasiái/v
componguèri/w
componherai/x
compreniái/v
concebèri/w
concebrai/x
conclusiái/v
concorrerai/x
condisiái/v
conduguèri/w
conduirai/x
coneissiái/v
confiar/azh
conjonhiái/v
conquereguèri/w
conquerrai/x
conseguiái/v
construsiái/v
contenguèri/w
contradirai/x
contrariar/azh
contraveniái/v
conveniái/v
convenquèri/w
conviar/azh
convocarai/x
còrdolguèri/w
còrdoliái/v
corrompiái/v
corromprai/x
cregueri/w
creissiái/v
cresiái/v
creujarai/x
crocèri/w
deduirai/x
dedusiái/v
deguèri/w
delaiar/azh
deliar/azh
demoguèri/w
demourai/x
demoviái/v
depenhiái/v
depremerai/x
depremèri/w
desabituar/azh
desagreguèri/w
desaliar/azh
desapareisserai/x
desapareissiái/v
desaveniái/v
desaviar/azh
desbadoquèri/w
desboçarai/x
desclausèri/w
desclausiái/v
desclocarai/x
descoar/azh
descomplaguèri/w
desconeisserai/x
desconeissiái/v
desconoissiá/v
descoreguèri/w
descoserai/x
descosiái/v
descresiái/v
descriguèri/w
descroçarai/x
descuiar/azh
desegèri/w
desenraiar/azh
desflocarai/x
desfoguèri/w
desforviar/azh
desgaiar/azh
desjogarai/x
desjonguèri/w
desjonhiái/v
deslaiar/azh
desliar/azh
desmantendrai/x
desmemorièri/w
desmesconeissiái/v
desorriarai/x
desorrièri/w
despareissiái/v
despatriar/azh
desplaguèri/w
desplairai/x
desplasiái/v
destanguèri/w
destanherai/x
destanhiái/v
destenhiái/v
destrenguèri/w
destrenhiái/v
destriar/azh
destrocarai/x
desvaliái/v
desviar/azh
desvolguèri/w
desvouserai/x
desvousiái/v
deveniái/v
dialogarai/x
dialoguèri/w
disiái/v
dispariái/v
dissecarai/x
dissolguèri/w
distrasiái/v
dolrai/x
draiar/azh
droguèri/w
ebissoar/MTLQNaz
embeurai/MTLQNx
embeviái/MTLQNv
embocèri/MTLQNw
embraiar/MTLQNza
embraiar/za
embrocarai/MTLQNx
embroquèri/MTLQNw
emmerçarai/MTLQNx
empenguèri/MTLQNw
empremiái/MTLQNv
encenherai/MTLQNx
enchaiar/MTLQNza
enclausiái/MTLQNv
enclosquèri/MTLQNw
encoissarai/x
encreissiái/MTLQNv
encresquèri/MTLQNw
endirai/MTLQNx
endisiái/MTLQNv
endraiar/MTLQNaz
enfranguèri/MTLQNw
enfranhiái/MTLQNv
engloiarai/MTLQNx
enjoièri/w
ennegarai/MTLQNx
enquereguèri/MTLQNw
enraiar/MTLQNza
enrisiái/MTLQNv
enrocarai/MTLQNx
enseguèri/MTLQNw
entorcarai/MTLQNx
entorciái/MTLQNv
entraguèri/MTLQNw
entredisiái/MTLQNv
entrefoirai/MTLQNx
entreliar/MTLQNaz
entreponguèri/MTLQNw
entreponhiái/MTLQNv
entretendrai/MTLQNx
entreteniái/MTLQNv
enviar/MTLQNaz
enviar/za
equivalgueri/MTLQNw
equivaliái/MTLQNv
escairai/MTLQNx
escarnaissiái/MTLQNv
escasèri/MTLQNw
esclausiái/MTLQNv
escoar/MTLQNza
escodrai/x
escoissèri/w
escomoviái/MTLQNv
escorçarai/MTLQNx
escorreguèri/MTLQNw
escosiái/MTLQNv
escrocarai/MTLQNx
esforcèri/MTLQNw
esgaiar/MTLQNza
esmaiar/MTLQNza
esmerçarai/MTLQNx
esmoviái/MTLQNv
especèri/MTLQNw
esperdiái/MTLQNv
esperdrai/MTLQNx
esperrequèri/MTLQNw
espiar/MTLQNza
espichoar/MTLQNaz
espoliar/MTLQNza
estanhocarai/MTLQNx
estenhiái/MTLQNv
estoquèri/MTLQNw
estrairai/MTLQNx
estraviar/MTLQNza
estrenguèri/MTLQNw
estrusiái/MTLQNv
evaluar/MTLQNza
exclurai/MTLQNx
expatriar/MTLQNza
expiar/MTLQNza
expropriar/MTLQNza
extraguèri/MTLQNw
extrasiái/MTLQNv
extraviar/MTLQNza
fogarai/x
folhèri/w
fòraviar/zah
forviar/zah
fosiái/v
fotografiar/zah
gemegarai/x
girar/zah
goièri/w
graduar/zah
greujarai/x
griar/zah
groar/zah
gruar/zah
igar/MTLQNaz
incluguèri/MTLQNw
indusiái/MTLQNv
iniciar/MTLQNaz
insinuar/MTLQNaz
instigar/MTLQNaz
instruirai/MTLQNx
instrusiái/MTLQNv
interdiguèri/MTLQNw
interveniái/MTLQNv
intrigar/MTLQNaz
introduirai/MTLQNx
ipertrofiar/MTLQNaz
iragar/MTLQNaz
iraissiái/MTLQNv
irasquèri/MTLQNw
irrigar/MTLQNaz
issoar/MTLQNaz
jogarai/x
jonguèri/w
jonhiái/v
liar/azh
lisoar/azh
logarai/x
lusiguèri/w
maidisiái/v
maldirai/x
maldisái/v
maltraguèri/w
manteniái/v
meisserai/x
meissiái/v
mensdiguèri/w
mesaliar/azh
mesconeissiái/v
mescreirai/x
mescresiái/v
mesdiguèri/w
mespreniái/v
mofiar/azh
molguèri/w
molzerai/x
molziái/v
moviái/v
necarai/x
negocièri/w
noar/zah
nolguèri/w
noliái/v
nolrai/x
obteniái/MTLQNv
obviar/MTLQNza
ortografiar/MTLQNza
oscarai/MTLQNx
osquèri/MTLQNw
paissii/v
parai/x
pariái/v
parodiar/zah
parvenguèri/w
penediái/v
penedrai/x
penguèri/w
perceviái/v
perdiái/v
perdrai/x
perfocèri/w
perpetuar/azh
persegrai/x
perseguiái/v
persieguèri/w
pertanhiái/v
pertrairai/x
pervenguèri/w
perveniái/v
piar/azh
planherai/x
plasiái/v
poguèri/w
ponctuar/azh
ponhiái/v
pregarai/x
premèri/w
preniái/v
prevaliái/v
prevalrai/x
prevegèri/w
prevesiái/v
promourai/x
promoviái/v
proroguèri/w
quereguèri/w
queriái/v
querrai/x
raliar/azh
rambiar/azh
ranviar/azh
rebequèri/w
reboar/azh
reboscarai/x
recasiái/v
recebèri/w
recebrai/x
reclausiái/v
recluguèri/w
reclurai/x
recondusiái/v
reconoguèri/w
reconoisserai/x
reconoissiái/v
recosiái/v
recreguèri/w
recreisserai/x
recresiái/v
redemèri/w
redeviái/v
redirai/x
redisiái/v
refoguèri/w
refosiái/v
refotjarai/x
reguerguèri/w
rejonherai/x
remedièri/w
remerciarai/x
remordiái/v
renaissiái/v
renasquèri/w
renegarai/x
renviar/azh
repatriar/azh
repenedèri/w
repenhiái/v
repremerai/x
reprenguèri/w
repreniái/v
repudiar/azh
requeriái/v
resclauguèri/w
resclaurai/x
rescriviái/v
resesiái/v
resolviái/v
ressegarai/x
resseguèri/w
restrenhiái/v
reteisserai/x
retenhiái/v
retoquèri/w
retorcerai/x
retorciái/v
retrolhèri/w
reveirai/x
reveniái/v
reviviái/v
revogèri/w
revojarai/x
risiái/v
roguèri/w
romegarai/x
sabiái/v
sangbeguèri/w
sangbeviái/v
sanoar/azh
secodrai/x
sedusiái/v
seguèri/w
seirai/x
sesiái/v
situar/azh
sobresesiái/v
sobrevendrai/x
sobrevenguèri/w
sobreviviái/v
solrai/x
solviái/v
somoguèri/w
soplojarai/x
sordèri/w
sordiái/v
sorziái/v
sostendrai/x
sostenguèri/w
sosteniái/v
subreprendrai/x
subreprenguèri/w
subrepreniái/v
subreveniái/v
subrogarai/x
subroguèri/w
subveniái/v
susprendrai/x
susprenguèri/w
suspreniái/v
tanhiái/v
tartocarai/x
tasèri/w
tatoar/azh
teissiái/v
telegrafiar/azh
tenecarai/x
tenhiái/v
tercèri/w
tipografiar/azh
tolái/v
tolrai/x
torcèri/w
tradusiái/v
transcriurai/x
trascriguèri/w
trascriviá/v
trassèguiái/v
trasvojarai/x
tremogèri/w
tresponherai/x
tresponhiái/v
tresprenguèri/w
triar/azh
trocarai/x
trolhèri/w
tuar/azh
umiliar/azh
valiái/v
veirai/x
venguèri/w
viviái/v
voar/azh
vogarai/x
voguèri/w
vouserai/x
